Utah statutes.
63A-3-201.   Appointment of accounting and other officers and employees by
director of the Division of Finance -- Delegation of powers and duties by
director.
(1)  With the approval of the executive director, the director of the Division
of Finance shall appoint an accounting officer and  other administrative
officers that are necessary to efficiently and economically perform the
functions of the Division of Finance.
(2)  The director of the Division of Finance may:
(a)  organize the division and employ other assistants to discharge the
functions of the division;
(b)  delegate to assistants, officers, and employees any of the powers and
duties of the office subject to his or her control and subject to any
conditions he may prescribe; and
(c)  delegate the powers and duties of the office only by written order filed
with the lieutenant governor.
